California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
 area of California north of the northern boundary of District No. 1 and south of a line described as beginning at the intersection of the shoreline of the Pacific Ocean with a line projected due west from the intersection of U.S. Highway No. 466 and California State Highway No. 1; thence easterly along U.S. Highway No. 466 to the town of Famoso; thence from Famoso northeasterly along the Famoso to Woody County Road to the town of Woody; thence along a line due north to a point on the northern boundary of the County of Kern; thence easterly along the northern boundary of the County of Kern and along the northern boundary of the County of San Bernardino to the point of intersection with the California-Nevada state boundary. 

(c) District 3, which includes all that area of California north of the northern boundary of District No. 2 and south of a line described as beginning at the point of intersection of the shoreline of the Pacific Ocean
 with the westerly projection of the north line of Township 23 south, M.D. B. & M.; thence easterly along the north line of Township 23 south projected to the point of intersection with the Principal San Bernardino Meridian; thence due east along a line to the point of intersection with the California-Nevada state boundary. 

(d) District 4, which includes all that area of California north of the northern boundary of District No. 3 and south of a line described as beginning at the point of intersection of the shoreline of the Pacific Ocean with the westerly projection of the north line of Township 18 south, M.D. B. & M.; thence easterly along the north line of Township 18 south projected to the point of intersection with the Principal San Bernardino Meridian; thence southerly along the Principal San Bernardino Meridian to the Fifth Standard Parallel north, S.B. B. & M.; thence easterly along the Fifth Standard Parallel north to
 the point of intersection with the California-Nevada state boundary. 

(e) District 5, which includes all that area of California north of the northern boundary of District No. 4 and south of a line described as beginning at the point of intersection of the shoreline of the Pacific Ocean with the Fourth Standard Parallel south M. D. B. & M.; thence easterly along the Fourth Standard Parallel south to the point of intersection with the southerly projection of McCall Road in the County of Fresno; thence northerly along McCall Road to the point of intersection with Rose Avenue in the County of Fresno; thence easterly along Rose Avenue and along the easterly projection of Rose Avenue to the point of intersection with the main channel of Kings River; thence northerly along Kings River to the point of intersection with California State Highway Sign Route No. 180; thence easterly along California State Highway Sign Route No. 180 to the point
 of intersection with the County of Fresno boundary; thence due east along a line to the point of intersection with the California-Nevada state boundary. 

(f) District 6, which includes all that area of California north of the northern boundary of District No. 5 and south of a line described as beginning at the point of intersection of the shoreline of the Pacific Ocean with the northern boundary of the County of Monterey; thence easterly along the northern boundary of the County of Monterey to the northern boundary of the County of San Benito; thence easterly along the northern boundary of the County of San Benito to a point on the western boundary of the County of Merced; thence northeasterly along the western boundary of the County of Merced to the northern boundary of the County of Merced; thence easterly along the northern boundary of the County of Merced to a point on the northern boundary of the County of Mariposa; thence easterly
 along the northern boundary of the County of Mariposa to the eastern boundary of the County of Madera; thence southerly along the eastern boundary of the County of Madera to a point on the western boundary of the County of Mono; and also including all of the area in the County of Mono, California. 

(g) District 7, which includes all that area of California not included in any other district.

(h) The commission may change the district boundaries by a two-thirds vote of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 7.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Table Grape Commission [65550. - 65576.]

65550.

There is in the state government the California Table Grape Commission. The commission shall comprise three producers from each district appointed by the secretary from the nominees selected pursuant to this article and one public member appointed pursuant to Section 65575.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 8.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65551.

The California Table Grape Commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It shall adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records and acts, when certified by the secretary and authenticated by the corporate seal, shall be admissable in evidence in all courts of the state, and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65552.

The commission may employ a president, a treasurer, and a secretary. The compensation of each officer shall be fixed by the commission and they shall serve at the pleasure of the commission with powers and duties that may be delegated to them by the commission. An officer employed pursuant to this section shall not be a commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 9.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65553.

A commissioner shall be an individual producer, or a partner or employee of a producer, who is actively engaged in growing fresh grapes within this state for a period of at least five years and is producing grapes subject to this chapter at the time of the election. No more than two members shall be persons employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, the same corporation, firm, partnership, association, or business entity, provided that not more than one member in any district shall be so employed or connected. A commissioner shall maintain these qualifications during their term of office in order to remain on the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 10.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65555.

The regular terms of office of the commissioners shall be three years from the date of appointment by the secretary and until their successors are appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 12.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65556.

Each commissioner for each district shall be elected by a plurality of votes cast by producers in the district. Each producer who has grown fresh grapes in a district in the year preceding an election shall be entitled to one vote in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 13.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65559.

The commission shall annually compile and maintain a list of eligible producers and certify the list to the secretary at least 30 days before the date set for a meeting to nominate commissioners to office. The list shall constitute the list of producers qualified to vote in the election of commissioners.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 16.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65559.5.

(a) The commission, in preparing a list of producers to be used under this chapter, may omit from the list any person who makes only casual sales or sales as a result of activities other than a commercial farm business venture, as determined by the commission. A person who is omitted from the list is not subject to this chapter, including the payment of any assessments, and is not qualified as a producer under this chapter.

(b) A person omitted from a list pursuant to this section may be included on any subsequent list if the person is found to be qualified as a producer at the time of preparing the list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 17.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65562.

Upon establishment of the lists of producers, the secretary shall call meetings of producers in each district, for the purpose of nominating persons to be appointed to the office of commissioner. At each district meeting for the nomination of commissioners, the secretary or a representative authorized by the secretary shall preside, and receive nominations, and at the conclusion of the meeting shall announce the names of the persons nominated at the meetings and the time, the manner, and instructions for voting by mail. Thereafter, within 10 days after the meeting, the secretary shall mail to all producers ballots for the election of commissioners in the respective districts, with instructions for voting by mail. All votes shall be required to be delivered to the secretary or mailed for delivery within 10 days after issuance of ballots by the
 secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 20.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65563.

Upon expiration of the voting period, the secretary shall tabulate all votes and appoint a commissioner for each district. If all nominees are unsatisfactory to the secretary, the commission shall continue to submit lists of nominees to the secretary until the secretary has made a selection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 21.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65564.

Nonreceipt of notice of a meeting for the nomination of commissioners or of ballots shall not invalidate any such meeting, nomination or election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65566.

A person appointed to the office of commissioner by the secretary shall be selected pursuant to the nomination, election, and appointment procedures established by the commission in accordance with this chapter and approved by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 23.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65567.

In the event the office of a commissioner becomes vacant due to failure to qualify, resignation, disqualification, death or for any other reason, such position shall be filled by an election held by the commission. Nominations shall be received by the commission from the remaining commissioners in the district where the vacancy exists. An election shall then be held by the commission and a majority vote shall elect a commissioner, subject to appointment by the director, to fill out the unexpired term for which such election is being held. Vacancies occurring within six months prior to a regular district election may remain vacant until the next regular election. Commission members elected at special elections shall serve the unexpired term of the office to which they are appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1105.)
-------------------------------------------

65568.

A majority of the members of the commission at any meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and the carrying out of the duties of said commission. Unless otherwise fixed by the commission, the vote of a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65569.

A commissioner shall not receive a salary. A commissioner may receive necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 24.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65570.

All moneys received by a person from the assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be paid to the commission, shall be deposited into such banks as the commission may designate, and shall be disbursed by order of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 25.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65571.

The State of California shall not be liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payment of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission shall be limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member of the commission or any employee or agent thereof shall be personally liable on the contracts of the commission nor shall a commissioner or employees of such commission be responsible individually in any way to any producer or shipper or any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No commissioner shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of such commission. The liability of the commissioners shall be several and not joint, and no commissioner shall be liable for the default of any other commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65572.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) To elect a chairperson, and from time to time other officers as it may deem advisable, and delegate duties to the officers as may appear advisable.

(b) To adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary rules, regulations, procedures, and orders for the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties, including rules for regulation of appeals from any rule, regulation, procedure, or order of the commission.

(c) To administer and enforce this chapter, and do and perform all acts and exercise all powers
 incidental to or in connection with effectuating, or deemed reasonably necessary, proper, or advisable to effectuate, the purposes of this chapter.

(d) To employ, and at its pleasure discharge, a president, a treasurer, a secretary, employees, and necessary personnel, including attorneys engaged in the private practice of the law, fix their compensation and terms of employment, prescribe their duties, and incur expenses as it may deem reasonably necessary and proper to properly perform its duties as authorized by this chapter. The Attorney General shall aid and assist the commission on its request and shall undertake judicial proceedings as requested by the commission to undertake on its behalf.

(e) To establish offices, incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, and create liabilities and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary,
 in the opinion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(f) To keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which shall be open to inspection and audit by the department, as directed by the secretary.

(g) In the discretion of the commission, to investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for criminal violations of this chapter.

(h) To promote the sale of fresh grapes by advertising and other similar means for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for fresh grapes, and to educate and instruct the public with respect to fresh grapes, the uses and
 time to use the several varieties, and the healthful properties and dietetic value of fresh grapes.

(i) In the discretion of the commission, to educate and instruct the wholesale and retail trade with respect to proper methods of handling and selling fresh grapes; arrange for the performance of dealer service work providing display and other promotional materials; make market surveys and analyses; present facts to, and negotiate with, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters that affect the marketing, production, and distribution of fresh grapes; and undertake any other similar activities that the commission may determine appropriate for the maintenance and expansion of present markets and the creation of new and larger markets for fresh grapes.

(j) In the discretion of the commission, to make in the name of the commission contracts to render service in formulating and
 conducting plans and programs, and other contracts or agreements as the commission may deem necessary for the promotion of the sale of fresh grapes.

(k) In the discretion of the commission, to conduct, and contract with others to conduct, scientific research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from that research or elsewhere with respect to the marketing and distribution of fresh grapes, the production, storage, refrigeration, inspection, and transportation of fresh grapes, develop and discover the dietetic value of fresh grapes, develop and expand markets, and improve cultural practices and product handling so that the various varieties may be placed in the hands of the ultimate consumer in the best possible condition. In connection with that research, the commission may accept contributions of, or may match, private, state, or federal funds that may be available for these purposes, and may
 employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies conducting that research.

(l) In the discretion of the commission, to accept and match contributions of private, local, state, or federal funds and make contributions of commission funds to other persons or local, state, or federal agencies for purposes of promoting, enhancing, and maintaining the California fresh grape industry.

(m) In the discretion of the commission, to cooperate with other private or governmental entities in the resolution of emergencies arising in the industry and impacting the health and safety of the public or the continued stability of the table grape industry.

(n) To determine, subject to the limitations provided in Section 65600, not later than May 1 of each year, the assessment for the following
 12-month period beginning on May 1 and ending on April 30.

(o) In the discretion of the commission, to publish and distribute without charge a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information relating to the fresh grape industry to producers and shippers.

(p) In the discretion of the commission, to administer any program related to the table grape industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 26.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65573.

(a) The commission shall continue to operate if, in a referendum conducted by the commission in which at least 40 percent of the total number of producers certified as marketing 40 percent of the total volume marketed by all producers on the list during the last completed marketing season participate, the secretary finds that either the following occurs:

 (1) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operation of the commission, and that the producers voting in favor marketed 51 percent or more of the total quantity of table grapes marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(2) Fifty-one
 percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operation of the commission and that the producers voting in favor marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of table grapes marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) The commission shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum that shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days, and may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum.

(c) Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate the referendum. If the commission finds that a vote in favor of the continuing the operation of the commission has been given as provided in this section, it shall so certify to the secretary and give notice of the favorable vote by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in each
 district in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code and mail a copy of the notice to all producers and shippers whose names and addresses may be on file with the commission. The operation of the commission shall become effective upon completion of publication and 15 days after the certification to the secretary.

(d) If the commission finds that a vote in favor of the operation of the commission has not been given as provided in this section, it shall certify that finding to the secretary, who shall declare the suspension of the operation of the commission upon the expiration of the current marketing season. Upon the declaration, the operations of the commission shall be wound up and funds shall be distributed in the manner provided in Sections 65662 and 65663.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 27.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65574.

The commission shall appoint a shipper advisory committee of five members appointed from shippers at large to advise the commission on the exercise of its powers and duties under this chapter. Each member shall be an individual shipper, or a partner or employee of a shipper, who is actively engaged in shipping fresh grapes in this state for a period of at least five years. A member of the shipper advisory committee shall maintain these qualifications during their appointment to the committee in order to remain on the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 28.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65575.

Members of the shipper advisory committee shall not receive a salary. Members of the shipper advisory committee may receive necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 29.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65575.1.

The public member of the commission shall be appointed by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission. If all nominees are unsatisfactory to the secretary, the commission shall continue to submit lists of nominees to the secretary until the secretary has made a selection.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 31.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65575.2.

The public member of the commission shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters coming before the commission and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the commission. The public member shall have no financial interest in the table grape industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 32.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65576.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that producers or employees of producers appointed to the commission pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such commission, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1429.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assessments and Records [65600. - 65605.]

65600.

(a) There is hereby levied and imposed upon all fresh grapes shipped during each marketing season an assessment as fixed by the commission at that amount determined by the commission as reasonably necessary to pay all obligations incurred or to be incurred in accordance with this chapter and as reasonably necessary to carry out the objects and purposes of this chapter. However, during any marketing season, the assessment shall not exceed $0.02 per pound, computed on net weight when shipped, whether in bulk or loose in boxes or in any other container or packed in any style package.

(b) All shipments of 150 pounds or less of fresh grapes sold or shipped by a producer direct to the consumer are exempt from the assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 33.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65601.

A shipper shall keep a complete and accurate record of all fresh grapes shipped by the shipper and the producer. The records shall be in simple form and contain the information prescribed by the commission. The records shall be preserved for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 34.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65602.

Every shipper shall, at such times as the commission may by rule or regulation require, file with the commission a return, under oath, on forms to be prescribed and furnished by the commission, stating the quantity of fresh grapes shipped by him during the period or periods of time prescribed by the commission. The names of producers in each district for which such shipper has shipped, and such further information as may be necessary in the discretion of the commission to carry out the object and purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65603.

All information obtained by the commission from shippers shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed, except when required by a court order in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 35.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65604.

All assessments imposed by this chapter shall be due and payable and shall be paid to the commission by each shipper. The commission shall, by rule or regulations, prescribe the time and method of payment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65605.

All such assessments shall be paid to the commission by the shipper first shipping such fresh grapes. Every shipper is authorized to collect such assessments from a producer, and shall deduct the assessment from any moneys owed to any such producer. Every shipper shall be primarily and personally liable for the payment of any such assessment, and failure of the shipper to collect the same from any producer shall not exempt any shipper from such primary liability. Any shipper who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required shall thereby forfeit to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of such assessment determined to be due, but if the commission is satisfied that the delay was excusable, may remit all or any part of such penalty. Such penalty shall be paid to the commission and shall be available for expenditure in the same manner as an assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Actions and Penalties [65650. - 65654.]

65650.

The commission may, if it believes a violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation has occurred, or in the event of nonpayment of any assessment, bring an action in its name for collection of such assessment, civil penalties or for injunctive relief, including specific performance, of any obligation imposed by this chapter or any rule or regulation issued hereunder, or both, against any person violating any provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation duly issued by the commission hereunder.

If it appears to the court, upon any application for a temporary restraining order or upon the hearing of any order to show cause why a preliminary injunction should not be issued or upon the hearing of any motion for a preliminary injunction, or if the court shall find in any such action that any defendant therein is violating or has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation duly issued by the commission hereunder, then the court shall enjoin such defendant from committing further violations and may compel specific performance of any obligation imposed by this chapter or any rule or regulation issued by the commission hereunder.

In any such action, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not exist.

In any such action or proceeding, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the commission therein and shall, upon entry of any final judgment, enjoin any such shipper from further shipping until payment of any judgment entered for money and from further violating or aiding in violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65650.5.

(a) A person aggrieved by an action of the commission may file a grievance with the commission or a duly authorized committee of the commission designated for that purpose. An appeal from a decision of the commission may be made to the secretary. The secretary shall review the record of the proceedings before the commission. If the secretary finds that the record shows by substantial evidence that the commission’s action was not an abuse of discretion or illegal, the secretary shall dismiss the appeal.

(b) If the secretary finds that the action is not substantially sustained by the record, was an abuse of discretion, or illegal, the secretary may reverse the action of the commission.

(c) A decision
 of the secretary is subject to judicial review upon petition of the commission or any party aggrieved by the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 36.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65651.

Any person subject to this chapter and allegedly aggrieved hereby or by any rule, or order of the commission shall comply with and exhaust the appeal procedure prescribed, in accordance with this chapter, by the rules and regulations of the commission, before application to any court for relief therefrom. The decision of the commission, in accordance with such rules and regulations, unless arbitrary or without evidentiary support, shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65651.5.

An action by the commission for a violation of this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of discovery of the alleged violation. An action against the commission by a person shall be commenced within two years from the date of the act of which the person complains.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 37.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65652.

Venue for actions commenced by the commission may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 39.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65653.

It shall be a misdemeanor for:

(a) Any person to violate or aid in the violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission.

(b) Any person to willfully render or furnish a false or fraudulent report, statement or record required by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or any rules or regulations of the commission.

(c) Any person engaged in the shipping of table grapes or in the wholesale or retail trade thereof to fail or refuse to furnish to the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom he has received table grapes, regulated hereby, and the quantity of such commodity so received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65654.

Agents of the commission, upon specific written authorization signed by the chairman or secretary of the commission, shall have the right to inspect the premises, books, records, documents and all other instruments of any carrier, railroad, truck, boat, grower, shipper, dealer or retailer for the purpose of enforcing this chapter and collecting the assessments levied under authority of this chapter. In the event of refusal of any person to allow such inspection, the commission may apply to any court for the issuance of a subpoena to compel such inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Suspension of Operations [65660. - 65663.]

65660.

(a) Before the initiation of a referendum for the continuation of the operation of the commission, as described in Section 65573, and upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commissioners that the commission has effectuated the purposes of this chapter, the commission may file a petition with the secretary recommending that the commission continue to operate.

(b) The secretary may, upon receipt of the recommendation, grant the petition or hold a public hearing to review the petition. Upon conclusion of the hearing, the secretary may grant the petition or require a referendum to be conducted among producers in accordance with Section 65573 to determine if the commission will continue to operate. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures
 as may be necessary to conduct the referendum.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 41.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65661.

At the close of the referendum period established for any referendum required by Section 65660, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during that period. The secretary shall declare the suspension of the operation of the commission, effective upon expiration of the current marketing season, if at least 40 percent of the total number of producers, as established by the secretary as marketing 40 percent of the total volume marketed by all producers on the list established by the commission during the last completed marketing season, participate in the referendum and the secretary finds that either of the following occurs:(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of the suspension, and the
 producers voting in favor marketed 51 percent or more of the total quantity of table grapes marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.(b) Fifty-one percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of the suspension, and the producers voting in favor marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of table grapes marketed in the preceding season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 42.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65662.

Upon and after the effective date of suspension of the operation of the commission, the operations of the commission shall be wound up and any and all moneys remaining held by the commission, collected by assessment in the prior marketing year and not required to defray the expenses of winding up and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding current marketing season; provided further, however, that if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of that pro rata refund to those persons, any moneys remaining from assessments collected in the prior marketing year after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be paid to a state or
 federal program benefiting the California table grape industry, or to a private organization that has received tax-exempt status from the Internal Revenue Service and that benefits the California table grape industry. Moneys from prior assessment years, investments, investment income, and remaining grant funds shall be paid to a state or federal program benefiting the California table grape industry, or to a private organization that has received tax-exempt stats from the Internal Revenue Service and benefits the California table grape industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 43.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65663.

Upon suspension of the operation of the commission, a notice of the suspension shall be posted on the department’s website. The commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers and shippers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file with the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 44.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Miscellaneous [65671. - 65674.]

65671.

In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of the Cartwright Act (Section 16700, Business and Professions Code, and following), the Unfair Practices Act (Section 17000, Business and Professions Code, and following), the Fair Trade Act (Section 16900, Business and Professions Code, and following), Section 1673 of the Civil Code, or any rule of statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, proof that the act complained of was done in compliance with the provisions of this chapter or a rule or regulation of the commission issued under this chapter and in furtherance of purposes and provisions of this chapter, shall be a complete defense to such action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65673.

The commission shall reimburse to the secretary all expenses incurred by them in the supervision of elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 46.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65674.
